Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.0291

Savings report—2012 c 230.

By January 1, 2017, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must report to the legislature and the governor on: (1) The amount of savings resulting from use of the higher education provisions of chapter 230, Laws of 2012; and (2) the manner in which such savings were used to promote student academic success.

[ 2012 c 230 s 5.]